Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.280

Court-ordered interim measures.

A court shall have the same power of issuing an interim measure in relation to arbitration proceedings, irrespective of whether their place is in the territory of this state, as it has in relation to proceedings in courts. The court shall exercise such power in accordance with its own procedures in consideration of the specific features of international arbitration.

[ 2015 c 276 s 28.]